Nebraska, session 109, LB1110A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1110A LB1110A
2026 2026
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $105,300 from the
Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund for FY2026-27 and (2) $-0- from
the Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund for FY2027-28 to the
Department of Revenue, for Program 102, to aid in carrying out the
provisions of Legislative Bill 1110, One Hundred Ninth Legislature,
Second Session, 2026.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
for state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this
section.
Sec. 2. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-